Rhode Island, session 2025, SB660.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-19-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-19 entitled "Relief of
Injured and Deceased Fire Fighters and Police Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-19-1. Salary payment during line of duty illness or injury.
(a)(1) Whenever any police officer of the Rhode Island airport corporation or whenever
any police officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or
deputy fire marshal of any city, town, fire district, or the state of Rhode Island is wholly or partially
incapacitated by reason of injuries received or sickness contracted in the performance of his or her
duties or due to their rendering of emergency assistance within the physical boundaries of the state
of Rhode Island at any occurrence involving the protection or rescue of human life which
necessitates that they respond in a professional capacity when they would normally be considered
by their employer to be officially off-duty, the respective city, town, fire district, state of Rhode
Island, or Rhode Island airport corporation by which the police officer, firefighter, crash rescue
crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire marshal, is employed, shall,
during the period of the incapacity, pay the police officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire
marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire marshal, the salary or wage and benefits to which
the police officer, firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or
deputy fire marshal, would be entitled had he or she not been incapacitated, and shall pay the
medical, surgical, dental, optical, or other attendance, or treatment, nurses, and hospital services,

medicines, crutches, and apparatus for the necessary period, except that if any city, town, fire
district, the state of Rhode Island, or Rhode Island airport corporation provides the police officer,
firefighter, crash rescue crewperson, fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, or deputy fire marshal,
with insurance coverage for the related treatment, services, or equipment, then the city, town, fire
district, the state of Rhode Island, or Rhode Island airport corporation is only obligated to pay the
difference between the maximum amount allowable under the insurance coverage and the actual
cost of the treatment, service, or equipment. In addition, the cities, towns, fire districts, the state of
Rhode Island, or Rhode Island airport corporation shall pay all similar expenses incurred by a
member who has been placed on a disability pension and suffers a recurrence of the injury or illness
that dictated his or her disability retirement, subject to the provisions of subsection (j) herein.
(2) A police officer or firefighter diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder (as
described in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, current edition, published
by the American Psychiatric Association) by an individual who holds the title of an independent
licensed mental health professional with a master’s degree, related to the exposure of potentially
traumatic events, resulting from their acting within the course of their employment or from the
rendering of emergency assistance in the state of Rhode Island, at any occurrence involving the
protection or the rescue of human life while off-duty, as set forth in subsection (h) of this section,
shall be presumed to have sustained an injury in the line of duty, as that term is used in subsection
(a)(1) of this section, unless the contrary is proven by a fair preponderance of the evidence that the
post-traumatic stress injury/PTSD is not related to their job as a police officer or firefighter. The
benefits provided for under this section shall not be extended to a police officer or firefighter, if
their post-traumatic stress injury/PTSD diagnosis arises out of any disciplinary action, work
evaluation, job transfer, layoff, demotion, termination, or similar adverse job actions.
(b) As used in this section, “police officer” means and includes any chief or other member
of the police department of any city or town regularly employed at a fixed salary or wage and any
deputy sheriff, member of the fugitive task force, or capitol police officer, permanent
environmental police officer or criminal investigator of the department of environmental
management, or airport police officer, probation officer or parole officer.
(c) As used in this section, “firefighter” means and includes any chief or other member of
the fire department or rescue personnel of any city, town, or fire district, and any person employed
as a member of the fire department of the town of North Smithfield, or fire department or district
in any city or town.
(d) As used in this section, “crash rescue crewperson” means and includes any chief or
other member of the emergency crash rescue section, division of airports, or department of
LC001753 - Page 2 of 7

transportation of the state of Rhode Island regularly employed at a fixed salary or wage.
(e) As used in this section, “fire marshal,” “chief deputy fire marshal,” and “deputy fire
marshal” mean and include the fire marshal, chief deputy fire marshal, and deputy fire marshals
regularly employed by the state of Rhode Island pursuant to the provisions of chapter 28.2 of title
23.
(f) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island, except for sworn employees of the
Rhode Island state police, who is otherwise entitled to the benefits of chapter 19 of this title shall
be subject to the provisions of chapters 29 — 38 of title 28 for all case management procedures and
dispute resolution for all benefits.
(g) In order to receive the benefits provided for under this section, a police officer or
firefighter must prove to his or her employer that he or she had reasonable grounds to believe that
there was an emergency that required an immediate need for their assistance for the protection or
rescue of human life.
(h) Any claims to the benefits provided for under this section resulting from the rendering
of emergency assistance in the state of Rhode Island at any occurrence involving the protection or
rescue of human life while off-duty, shall first require those covered by this section to submit a
sworn declaration to their employer attesting to the date, time, place, and nature of the event
involving the protection or rescue of human life causing the professional assistance to be rendered
and the cause and nature of any injuries sustained in the protection or rescue of human life. Sworn
declarations shall also be required from any available witness to the alleged emergency involving
the protection or rescue of human life.
(i) All declarations required under this section shall contain the following language:
“Under penalty of perjury, I declare and affirm that I have examined this declaration,
including any accompanying schedules and statements, and that all statements contained herein are
true and correct.”
(j) Any person, not employed by the state of Rhode Island, receiving injured-on-duty
benefits pursuant to this section, and subject to the jurisdiction of the state retirement board for
accidental retirement disability, for an injury occurring on or after July 1, 2011, shall apply for an
accidental disability retirement allowance from the state retirement board not later than the later of
eighteen (18) months after the date of the person’s injury that resulted in the person’s injured-on-
duty status or sixty (60) days from the date on which the treating physician certifies that the person
has reached maximum medical improvement. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit or alter
any and all rights of the parties with respect to independent medical examination or otherwise, as
set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement. Notwithstanding the forgoing, any
LC001753 - Page 3 of 7

person receiving injured-on-duty benefits as the result of a static and incapacitating injury whose
permanent nature is readily obvious and ascertainable shall be required to apply for an accidental
disability retirement allowance within sixty (60) days from the date on which the treating physician
certifies that the person’s injury is permanent, or sixty (60) days from the date on which the
determination of permanency is made in accordance with the independent medical examination
procedures as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(1) If a person with injured-on-duty status fails to apply for an accidental disability
retirement allowance from the state retirement board within the time frame set forth above, that
person’s injured-on-duty payment shall terminate. Further, any person suffering a static and
incapacitating injury as set forth in subsection (j) above and who fails to apply for an accidental
disability benefit allowance as set forth in subsection (j) shall have his or her injured-on-duty
payment terminated.
(2) A person who so applies shall continue to receive injured-on-duty payments, and the
right to continue to receive IOD payments of a person who so applies shall terminate in the event
of a final ruling of the workers’ compensation court allowing accidental disability benefits. Nothing
herein shall be construed to limit or alter any and all rights of the parties with respect to independent
medical examination or otherwise, as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(k) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island who is currently receiving injured-
on-duty benefits or any person employed by the state of Rhode Island who in the future is entitled
to injured-on-duty benefits pursuant to this chapter, and subject to the jurisdiction of the state
retirement board for accidental retirement disability, shall apply for an accidental disability
retirement allowance from the state retirement board not later than sixty (60) days from the date on
which a treating physician or an independent medical examiner certifies that the person has reached
maximum medical improvement, and in any event not later than eighteen (18) months after the date
of the person’s injury that resulted in the person being on injured-on-duty. Nothing herein shall be
construed to limit or alter any and all rights of the parties with respect to independent medical
examination or otherwise, as set forth in the applicable collective bargaining agreement.
Notwithstanding the forgoing, any person receiving injured-on-duty benefits as the result of a static
and incapacitating injury whose permanent nature is readily obvious and ascertainable shall be
required to apply for an accidental disability retirement allowance within sixty (60) days from the
date on which a treating physician or an independent medical examiner certifies that the person’s
injury is permanent, or sixty (60) days from the date on which such determination of permanency
is made in accordance with the independent medical examination procedures as set forth in the
applicable collective bargaining agreement.
LC001753 - Page 4 of 7

(1) If a person employed by the state of Rhode Island with injured-on-duty status fails to
apply for an accidental disability retirement allowance from the state retirement board within the
time frame set forth in subsection (k) above, that person’s injured-on-duty payment shall terminate.
Further, any person employed by the state of Rhode Island suffering a static and incapacitating
injury as set forth in subsection (k) above and who fails to apply for an accidental disability benefit
allowance as set forth in subsection (k) shall have his or her injured-on-duty payment terminated.
(2) A person employed by the state of Rhode Island who so applies shall continue to receive
injured-on-duty payments, and the right to continue to receive injured-on-duty payments of a
person who so applies shall terminate upon final adjudication by the state retirement board
approving or denying either ordinary or accidental disability payments and, notwithstanding § 45-
31.2-9, this termination of injured-on-duty benefits shall not be stayed.
(3)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all persons employed by the state of
Rhode Island entitled to benefits under this section who were injured prior to July 1, 2019, and who
have been receiving injured-on-duty benefits pursuant to this section for a period of eighteen (18)
months or longer as of July 1, 2019, shall have up to ninety (90) days from July 1, 2019, to apply
for an accidental disability retirement benefit allowance. Any person employed by the state of
Rhode Island receiving injured-on-duty benefits for a period less than eighteen (18) months as of
July 1, 2019, shall apply for an accidental disability retirement benefit allowance within eighteen
(18) months of the date of injury that resulted in the person receiving injured-on-duty pay; provided
however, said person shall have a minimum of ninety (90) days to apply.
Applications for disability retirement received by the state retirement board by any person
employed by the State of Rhode Island receiving injured-on-duty payments that shall be deemed
untimely pursuant to § 36-10-14(b) shall have ninety (90) days from July 1, 2019, to apply for an
accidental disability retirement benefit allowance. Failure to apply for an accidental disability
retirement benefit allowance within the timeframe set forth herein shall result in the termination of
injured-on-duty benefits.
(ii) Any person employed by the state of Rhode Island receiving injured-on-duty payments
who has been issued a final adjudication of the state retirement board on an application for an
ordinary or accidental disability benefit, either approving or denying the application, shall have his
or her injured-on-duty payments terminated.
(4) If awarded an accidental disability pension, any person employed by the state of Rhode
Island covered under this section shall receive benefits consistent with § 36-10-15.
LC001753 - Page 5 of 7

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001753
========
LC001753 - Page 6 of 7